Florida, session 2026, HB219.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, the Agency for
Health Care Administration shall reimburse licensed providers
who provide nonnursing services, such as home health agencies
and nurse registries, participating in the Medicaid long-term
managed care program at a rate that is at least the same rate or
higher than the rate it reimburses unlicensed providers for such
services, such as family caregivers. The agency shall annually
adjust the rate for licensed providers to accommodate inflation
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb219-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 219 2026
and overhead costs.
(2) Within 30 days after the effective date of this act,
the agency shall request any Medicaid waiver or state plan
amendment necessary to implement these rate changes.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb219-00